dict/pt_BR.aff
FLAG UTF-8
SFX n   0       -no-ão         ear
SFX n   0       -nos-ão        ear
SFX n   0       -se-ão         ear
SFX n   0       -te-ão         ear
SFX n   0       -vos-ão        ear
SFX n   0       -lhe-ás        ear
SFX n   0       -lhes-ás       ear
SFX n   0       -me-ás         ear
SFX n   0       -nos-ás        ear
SFX n   0       -se-ás         ear
SFX n   0       -te-ás         ear
SFX n   0       -vos-ás        ear
SFX n   0       -lhe-ei        ear
SFX n   0       -lhes-ei       ear
SFX n   0       -me-ei         ear
SFX n   0       -nos-ei        ear
SFX n   0       -se-ei         ear
SFX n   0       -te-ei         ear
SFX n   0       -vos-ei        ear
SFX n   0       em-lhe         ear
SFX n   0       em-lhes        ear
SFX n   0       em-me          ear
SFX n   0       em-na          ear
SFX n   0       em-nas         ear
SFX n   0       em-no          ear
SFX n   0       em-nos         ear
SFX n   0       em-se          ear
SFX n   0       em-te          ear
SFX n   0       em-vos         ear
SFX n   0       -la-emos       ear
SFX n   0       -las-emos      ear
SFX n   0       -lhe-emos      ear
SFX n   0       -lhes-emos     ear
SFX n   0       -lo-emos       ear
SFX n   0       -los-emos      ear
SFX n   0       -nos-emos      ear
SFX n   0       -te-emos       ear
SFX n   0       -vos-emos      ear
SFX n   0       -lhe-ia        ear
SFX n   0       -lhes-ia       ear
SFX n   0       -me-ia         ear
SFX n   0       -nos-ia        ear
SFX n   0       -se-ia         ear
SFX n   0       -te-ia         ear
SFX n   0       -vos-ia        ear
SFX n   0       -lhe-iam       ear
SFX n   0       -lhes-iam      ear
SFX n   0       -me-iam        ear
SFX n   0       -nos-iam       ear
SFX n   0       -se-iam        ear
SFX n   0       -te-iam        ear
SFX n   0       -vos-iam       ear
SFX n   0       íamo-nos       ear
SFX n   0       íamo-vos       ear
SFX n   0       íamos-lhe      ear
SFX n   0       íamos-lhes     ear
SFX n   0       íamos-te       ear
SFX n   0       mo-nos         ear
SFX n   0       mo-vos         ear
SFX n   0       mos-lhe        ear
SFX n   0       mos-lhes       ear
SFX n   0       mos-te         ear
SFX n   r       sse-a          ear
SFX n   r       sse-as         ear
SFX n   r       sse-lhe        ear
SFX n   r       sse-lhes       ear
SFX n   r       sse-me         ear
SFX n   r       sse-nos        ear
SFX n   r       sse-o          ear
SFX n   r       sse-os         ear
SFX n   r       sse-se         ear
SFX n   r       sse-te         ear
SFX n   r       sse-vos        ear
SFX n   r       ssem-lhe       ear
SFX n   r       ssem-lhes      ear
SFX n   r       ssem-me        ear
SFX n   r       ssem-na        ear
SFX n   r       ssem-nas       ear
SFX n   r       ssem-no        ear
SFX n   r       ssem-nos       ear
SFX n   r       ssem-te        ear
SFX n   r       ssem-vos       ear
SFX n   r       ste-a          ear
SFX n   r       ste-as         ear
SFX n   r       ste-lhe        ear
SFX n   r       ste-lhes       ear
SFX n   r       ste-me         ear
SFX n   r       ste-nos        ear
SFX n   r       ste-o          ear
SFX n   r       ste-os         ear
SFX n   r       ste-se         ear
SFX n   r       ste-te         ear
SFX n   r       ste-vos        ear
SFX n   r       va-a           ear
SFX n   r       va-as          ear
SFX n   r       va-lhe         ear
SFX n   r       va-lhes        ear
SFX n   r       va-me          ear
SFX n   r       va-nos         ear
SFX n   r       va-o           ear
SFX n   r       va-os          ear
SFX n   r       va-se          ear
SFX n   r       va-te          ear
SFX n   r       va-vos         ear
SFX n   r       vam-lhe        ear
SFX n   r       vam-lhes       ear
SFX n   r       vam-me         ear
SFX n   r       vam-na         ear
SFX n   r       vam-nas        ear
SFX n   r       vam-no         ear
SFX n   r       vam-nos        ear
SFX n   r       vam-se         ear
SFX n   r       vam-te         ear
SFX n   r       vam-vos        ear
SFX n   ar      ávamo-nos      ear
SFX n   ar      ávamo-vos      ear
SFX n   ar      ávamos-lhe     ear
SFX n   ar      ávamos-lhes    ear
SFX n   ar      ávamos-te      ear
SFX n   ar      ei-a           ear
SFX n   ar      ei-as          ear
SFX n   ar      ei-lhe         ear
SFX n   ar      ei-lhes        ear
SFX n   ar      ei-me          ear
SFX n   ar      ei-o           ear
SFX n   ar      ei-os          ear
SFX n   ar      ei-te          ear
SFX n   ar      ei-vos         ear
SFX n   ar      emo-nos        ear
SFX n   ar      emo-vos        ear
SFX n   ar      emos-lhe       ear
SFX n   ar      emos-lhes      ear
SFX n   ar      emos-te        ear
SFX n   ear     eia-a          ear
SFX n   ear     eia-as         ear
SFX n   ear     eia-lhe        ear
SFX n   ear     eia-lhes       ear
SFX n   ear     eia-me         ear
SFX n   ear     eia-nos        ear
SFX n   ear     eia-o          ear
SFX n   ear     eia-os         ear
SFX n   ear     eia-se         ear
SFX n   ear     eia-te         ear
SFX n   ear     eia-vos        ear
SFX n   ear     eiam-lhe       ear
SFX n   ear     eiam-lhes      ear
SFX n   ear     eiam-me        ear
SFX n   ear     eiam-na        ear
SFX n   ear     eiam-nas       ear
SFX n   ear     eiam-no        ear
SFX n   ear     eiam-nos       ear
SFX n   ear     eiam-se        ear
SFX n   ear     eiam-te        ear
SFX n   ear     eiam-vos       ear
SFX n   ear     eie-a          ear
SFX n   ear     eie-as         ear
SFX n   ear     eie-lhe        ear
SFX n   ear     eie-lhes       ear
SFX n   ear     eie-me         ear
SFX n   ear     eie-nos        ear
SFX n   ear     eie-o          ear
SFX n   ear     eie-os         ear
SFX n   ear     eie-se         ear
SFX n   ear     eie-te         ear
SFX n   ear     eie-vos        ear
SFX n   ear     eiem-lhe       ear
SFX n   ear     eiem-lhes      ear
SFX n   ear     eiem-me        ear
SFX n   ear     eiem-na        ear
SFX n   ear     eiem-nas       ear
SFX n   ear     eiem-no        ear
SFX n   ear     eiem-nos       ear
SFX n   ear     eiem-se        ear
SFX n   ear     eiem-te        ear
SFX n   ear     eiem-vos       ear
SFX n   ear     eio-a          ear
SFX n   ear     eio-as         ear
SFX n   ear     eio-lhe        ear
SFX n   ear     eio-lhes       ear
SFX n   ear     eio-me         ear
SFX n   ear     eio-nos        ear
SFX n   ear     eio-o          ear
SFX n   ear     eio-os         ear
SFX n   ear     eio-te         ear
SFX n   ear     eio-vos        ear
SFX n   ar      ou-a           ear
SFX n   ar      ou-as          ear
SFX n   ar      ou-lhe         ear
SFX n   ar      ou-lhes        ear
SFX n   ar      ou-me          ear
SFX n   ar      ou-nos         ear
SFX n   ar      ou-o           ear
SFX n   ar      ou-os          ear
SFX n   ar      ou-se          ear
SFX n   ar      ou-te          ear
SFX n   ar      ou-vos         ear

# ÊNCLISES E MESÓCLISES -o- Para verbos da regra -e-
