dict/pt_BR.dic
açotear/djLMnY
alcatear/djLMnY
ambrear/djLMnY
camear/djLnY
cerzir/djLMn
colmear/djLMnY
eclodir/djLMn
engolir/djLMnÂ
entressorrir/djLMn
erodir/djLMn
estrear/djLMnYÀ
estrepolir/djLMn
explodir/djLMn
expolir/djLMn
idear/djLnY
implodir/djLMn
lonquear/djLMnY
polir/djLMnÀÂ
rebolir/djLMn
rir/djLMn
sorrir/djLMnÀÂ
